Washington statutes.
RCW 39.12.080

Public works administration account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5167-S.SL) ***

The public works administration account is created in the state treasury. The department of labor and industries shall deposit in the account all moneys received from fees or civil penalties collected under RCW 39.12.050, 39.12.065, and 39.12.070. Appropriations from the account may be made only for the purposes of administration of this chapter, including, but not limited to, the performance of adequate wage surveys, and for the investigation and enforcement of all alleged violations of this chapter as provided for in this chapter and chapters 49.48 and 49.52 RCW. During the 2017-2019 fiscal biennium the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the public works administration account to the state general fund. It is the intent of the legislature to use the moneys transferred in the 2017-2019 biennium to support apprenticeship programs.

[ 2018 c 299 s 923; 2006 c 230 s 2; 2001 c 219 s 3; 1993 c 404 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 299: See note following RCW 43.41.433.

Effective date—2006 c 230: See note following RCW 39.12.070.

Effective date—1993 c 404: See note following RCW 39.12.070.